Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Resource Inducements.

Sec. 43.90.300.
Qualification for resource inducements.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, a lessee or other person that demonstrates to the satisfaction of the commissioners that the person has committed to acquire firm transportation capacity in the first binding open season of the project is qualified to receive the resource inducement set out in AS

43.90.310

and

43.90.320

for gas produced on the North Slope and shipped in firm transportation capacity acquired in the first binding open season of the project. The inducement in AS

43.90.310

is contractual.

A gas producer receiving a voucher under AS

43.90.330

is qualified to receive the resource inducement in AS

43.90.310

and

43.90.320

for the gas shipped in the firm transportation capacity described in the voucher for the period described in AS

43.90.330

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.310.
Royalty inducement.

Before the start of the first binding open season to be conducted by the licensee, the commissioner of natural resources shall adopt regulations that establish a method to determine the monthly value of the state’s royalty share of gas production and establish terms under which the state will exercise its right to switch between taking its royalty in value or in kind for gas committed for firm transportation in the first binding open season of the project or shipped in the firm transportation capacity described in a voucher received by the gas producer under AS

43.90.330

. The regulations must

minimize retroactive adjustments to the monthly value of the state’s royalty share of gas production;

provide a method for establishing a fair market value for each component of the state’s royalty gas that is based on pricing data from reliable and widely available industry trade publications and that uses appropriate adjustments to reflect

deductions for actual and reasonable transportation costs for the state’s royalty gas, including a reasonable share of the costs associated with unused capacity commitments on gas pipelines from the North Slope to the first destination market with reasonable market liquidity;

location differentials between the destination markets where North Slope gas could be sold;

reasonable and actual costs for gas processing; in this subparagraph, “gas processing” means post-production treatment of gas to extract natural gas liquids; and

deductions permitted under the 1980 Royalty Settlement Agreement for Prudhoe Bay gas; and

establish terms under which the state will exercise its authority to switch between taking its royalty gas in value and in kind to ensure that the state’s actions do not unreasonably

cause the lessee or other person to bear disproportionate transportation costs with respect to the state’s royalty gas;

interfere with the lessee’s or other person’s long-term marketing of its production.

If a lessee or other person qualified for a resource inducement under AS

43.90.300

agrees under (c) of this section, the lessee or other person is entitled to elect

to calculate its gas royalty obligation under the regulations adopted under (a) of this section for natural gas transported on a firm contract executed during the project’s first binding open season or under the methodology set out in the existing leases from which the gas is produced, and

upon the request of the lessee, the commissioner of natural resources shall contractually amend the existing lease to effect the election under this paragraph and incorporate as fixed contract terms the relevant regulatory provisions; and

the election under this paragraph remains in effect until new regulations are adopted as a result of a review under (d) of this section, at which time, a lessee or other person qualified under AS

43.90.300

may change its election under this paragraph; upon the request of the lessee, the commissioner of natural resources shall contractually amend the lease to incorporate as fixed contract terms the relevant revised regulatory provisions;

to enter into a contract with the state that amends the existing lease terms by providing a mechanism that ensures that, when the state exercises its right to switch between taking its royalty in value or in kind for gas committed for firm transportation in the first binding open season of the project, the lessee or other person does not bear disproportionate transportation costs with respect to the state’s royalty gas; and by modifying the required period of notice that the state must provide before exercising the state’s right to switch between taking its royalty in value or in kind for gas committed for firm transportation in the first binding open season of the project.

To claim the inducement under (b) of this section, a lessee or other person qualified under AS

43.90.300

shall agree, on an application form provided by the Department of Natural Resources, that the lessee or other person, and the lessee’s or other person’s affiliates, successors, assigns, and agents, will not protest or appeal a filing by the licensee to roll in expansion costs of the mainline up to a level that is required in AS

43.90.130

(7) if the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission does not have a rebuttable presumption in effect that rolled-in treatment applies to the cost of the expansion of the project. The agreement not to protest may not preclude the lessee or other person, or the lessee’s or other person’s affiliates, successors, assigns, and agents, from protesting a filing to roll in mainline expansion costs that the licensee is not required to propose and support under AS

43.90.130

(7).

The commissioner of natural resources shall provide for review of the regulations adopted under (a) of this section at least every two years after the commencement of commercial operations to determine whether the regulations continue to meet the requirements of (a) of this section under current conditions, and shall amend the regulations when the requirements are not being met.

No provision of this chapter precludes the election set out in (b) of this section, nor may the commissioner of natural resources assert any provision of any existing lease or unit agreement as precluding the elections set out in (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.320.
Gas production tax exemption.

If a person qualified for a resource inducement under AS

43.90.300

agrees under (c) of this section, the person is entitled to an annual exemption from the state’s gas production tax in an amount equal to the difference between the amount of the person’s gas production tax obligation calculated under the gas production tax in effect during that tax year and the amount of the person’s gas production tax obligation calculated under the gas production tax in effect at the start of the first binding open season held under this chapter. If the difference is less than zero, the gas production tax exemption is zero.

The exemption under this section may be applied within 10 years immediately following commencement of commercial operations and only applied to production taxes that are levied on North Slope gas shipped through firm transportation capacity the person acquired during the first binding open season or shipped in the firm transportation capacity described in a voucher received by the gas producer under AS

43.90.330

.

The person claiming the exemption under this section shall agree that the person, and the person’s affiliates, successors, assigns, and agents, will not protest or appeal a filing by the licensee to roll in mainline expansion costs up to the level that the licensee is required to propose and support under AS

43.90.130

(7) if the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission does not have a rebuttable presumption in effect that rolled-in treatment applies to the cost of the expansion of the project. The agreement required under this subsection may not preclude the person, or the person’s affiliates, successors, assigns, and agents, from protesting a filing to roll in mainline expansion costs that the licensee is not required to propose and support under AS

43.90.130

(7).

In this section, “gas production tax” means the tax levied on the production of gas under AS 43.55.

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)

Sec. 43.90.330.
Inducement vouchers.

A person that acquires firm transportation capacity in the first binding open season of the project, that does not hold an oil and gas lease on the North Slope, and that is not an affiliate of a person that holds an oil and gas lease on the North Slope may apply to the commissioners for a voucher under this section. A voucher issued by the commissioners must describe the firm transportation capacity in the project to which the voucher is applicable.

A voucher issued by the commissioners under this section entitles the holder of the voucher to the resource inducements in AS

43.90.310

and

43.90.320

for gas shipped in the firm transportation capacity acquired by the person applying for the voucher during the first binding open season of the project and described in the voucher. The voucher may be transferred to a gas producer that has a binding obligation to sell gas to the person transferring the voucher under a gas purchase agreement.

A gas producer holding a voucher may claim the resource inducements for gas shipped through the firm transportation capacity described in the voucher and only on gas that is produced and delivered to the purchaser on the North Slope. A gas producer may claim the resource inducements under this subsection until the earlier of the termination of the binding gas purchase agreement or the expiration of the inducements by operation of law.

A person that receives a voucher under this section and a gas producer that receives resource inducements under a voucher shall agree that the person and the gas producer and their respective affiliates, successors, assigns, or agents will not protest or appeal a filing by the licensee to roll in mainline expansion costs up to the level that the licensee is required to propose and support under AS

43.90.130

(7) if the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission does not have a rebuttable presumption in effect that rolled-in treatment applies to the cost of the expansion of the project. The agreement required under this subsection may not preclude the person or gas producer or their respective affiliates, successors, assigns, or agents from protesting a filing to roll in mainline expansion costs that the licensee is not required to propose and support under AS

43.90.130

(7).

History.

(§ 1 ch 22 SLA 2007)